Hawaii statutes.
§328-50 Fishing on commercial fishing
vessels. Anything in the statute or rules and regulations to the contrary
notwithstanding, fish caught and immediately placed on ice or otherwise
adequately chilled on commercial fishing vessels may be sold upon their return
to port. Any fish remaining unsold shall be placed in cold storage and may be
later sold at any time thereafter as long as the fish are not spoiled and unfit
for human consumption. [L 1947, c 187, §1; RL 1955, §51-49; HRS §328-50]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next